Massachusetts, session 194th, H1383.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special rule to the contrary, the health
policy commission, in collaboration with the center for health information and analysis and the
division of insurance, shall conduct an analysis and report on the use of prior authorization for
health care services and its impact on cost, quality and access.
(b) The report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) an assessment and inventory of
admissions, items, services, treatments, procedures and medications that require prior
authorization and that have a high rate of approval or denial for standard and expedited requests,
including after appeal; (ii) the timeline for review and adjudication, including the time to
adjudicate an appeal, for standard and expedited requests for admissions, items, services,
treatments, procedures and medications that require prior authorization; (iii) total health care
expenditures associated with the submission and processing, including appeals, of prior
authorization determinations; (iv) an analysis of the impact of prior authorization requirements
of 4

on patient access to and cost of care by patient demographics, geographic region and type of
service; (v) identification of admissions, items, services, treatments, procedures and medications
subject to prior authorization that have low variation in utilization across providers and carriers,
or low denial rates across carriers; (vi) identification of admissions, items, services, treatments,
procedures and medications subject to prior authorization for certain chronic disease services that
negatively impact chronic disease management; (vii) review and analysis of the integration of
standardized electronic prior authorization attachments, standardized forms, requirements and
decision support into electronic health records and other practice management software to
promote transparency and efficiency; (viii) review and analysis of a waiver of prior authorization
based on a carrier’s standards or policies, or “gold-carding status,” so called, and whether such
status is available to all providers in a carrier’s network; and (ix) recommendations regarding the
simplification of health insurance prior authorization standards and processes to improve health
care access and reduce the burden on health care providers.
(c) The report shall be informed by data and information submitted by carriers to the
division of health insurance and shall include, but not be limited to the following:
(1) a list of all admissions, items, services, treatments, procedures and medications that
require prior authorization;
(2) the number and percentage of standard prior authorization requests that were
approved, individualized for each admission, item, service, treatment, procedure and medication;
(3) the number and percentage of standard prior authorization requests that were denied,
individualized for each admission, item, service, treatment, procedure and medication;
of 4

(4) the number and percentage of standard prior authorization requests that were initially
denied and approved after appeal, individualized for each admission, item, service, treatment,
procedure and medication;
(5) the number and percentage of prior authorization requests for which the timeframe for
review was extended, and the request was approved, individualized for each admission, item,
service, treatment, procedure and medication;
(6) the number and percentage of expedited prior authorization requests that were
approved, individualized for each admission, item, service, treatment, procedure and medication;
(7) the number and percentage of expedited prior authorization requests that were denied,
individualized for each admission, item, service, treatment, procedure and medication;
(8) the average mean and median time that elapsed between the submission of a request
and a determination by the carrier for standard prior authorizations, individualized for each
admission, item, service, treatment, procedure and medication;
(9) the average and median time that elapsed between the submission of a request and a
decision by the carrier for expedited prior authorizations, individualized for each admission,
item, service, treatment, procedure and medication;
(10) the average and median time that elapsed to process an appeal submitted by a health
care provider initially denied by the carrier for standard prior authorizations, individualized for
each admission, item, service, treatment, procedure and medication; and
of 4

(11) the average and median time that elapsed to process an appeal submitted by a health
care provider initially denied by the carrier for expedited prior authorizations, individualized for
each admission, item, service, treatment, procedure and medication.
(d) The report and any legislative recommendations shall be submitted to the chairs of the
joint committee on health care financing, the house and senate committees on ways and means
not later than 1 year from the effective date of this act.
of 4